apertium-usp.usp.lexc
LEXICON Sufijos4

@D.Poss@:@D.Poss@                                            # ;
@R.Poss.Pl@:@R.Poss.Pl@%>q                                   # ;


LEXICON A-IV-12

%<s_sg1%>:%{í%}%{n%}%>                                       IV ;
%<s_sg2%>:at%>                                               IV ;
%<s_pl1%>:oj%>                                               IV ;
%<s_pl2%>:at%>                                               IV ;

LEXICON A-IV-3 

%<s_sg3%>:                                                   IV ;
%<s_pl3%>:                                                   IV ;

LEXICON A-IV

                                                             A-IV-12 ;
                                                             A-IV-3 ;
LEXICON A-TV-12

%<o_sg1%>:in%>                                               B-TV ;
%<o_sg2%>:at%>                                               B-TV ;
%<o_pl1%>:oj%>                                               B-TV ;
%<o_pl2%>:at%>                                               B-TV ;

LEXICON A-TV-3 

%<o_sg3%>:                                                   B-TV ;
%<o_pl3%>:                                                   B-TV ;

LEXICON A-TV
                                                             A-TV-12 ;
                                                             A-TV-3 ;

LEXICON B-TV

%<s_sg1%>:in%{w%}%>                                          TV ;
%<s_sg2%>:a%{w%}%>                                           TV ;
%<s_sg3%>:%{j%}%>                                            TV ;  ! tril
%<s_sg3%>:                                                   TV ;  ! tche'
%<s_pl1%>:q%{a%}%>                                           TV ;
%<s_pl2%>:a%{w%}%>                                           TV ;
%<s_pl3%>:%{j%}%>                                            TV ; 
%<s_pl3%>:                                                   TV ; 


LEXICON V-IV 

%<v%>%<iv%>:                                                 SS-IV ;
%<v%>%<iv%>:                                                 K ;

LEXICON V-TV-R-VAL

%<pass%>:                                                    SS-IV ; ! 
%<pass%>%<stat%>:%>saj                                       SS-IV ; !
%<pass%>:                                                    # ; ! 
%<pass%>%<stat%>:%>saj                                       # ; !

LEXICON V-TV-R-NONFIN

%<inf%>:%>ik                                                 # ;

LEXICON V-TV 

%<v%>%<tv%>:                                                 SS-TV ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:                                                 V-TV-R-VAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:                                                 V-TV-R-NONFIN ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:                                                 K ;

LEXICON V-TV-D

%<v%>%<tv%>:%>j                                              SS-TV ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:%>j                                              K ;


LEXICON N1

%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos1 ; 

LEXICON N2

%<n%>:%>ij                                                   Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:%>aaj                                                  Sufijos3 ; 

LEXICON N3

%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos1 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>iibʼ                                           Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>iibʼ                                           Sufijos1 ; 

LEXICON N4

%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos1 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>ibʼ                                            Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>ibʼ                                            Sufijos1 ; 

LEXICON N5

%<n%>:%>niik                                                 Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos3 ; 

LEXICON N6

%<n%>:%>xeel                                                 Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos3 ; 

LEXICON N7

%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos3 ; 

LEXICON N8

%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos1 ; 

LEXICON N9

%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos2 ; 

LEXICON N10

%<n%>:                                                       Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:%>il                                                   Sufijos3 ; 

LEXICON N11 
! FIXME: This is terrible

%<n%>:%>                                                     Sufijos1 ; 
%<n%>:%>                                                     Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:%>                                                     Sufijos4 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>s                                              Sufijos1 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>s                                              Sufijos2 ; 

LEXICON N12
! FIXME: This is terrible

%<n%>:ón%>                                                   Sufijos1 ; 
%<n%>:ón%>                                                   Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:ón%>                                                   Sufijos4 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:on%>es                                           Sufijos1 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:on%>es                                           Sufijos2 ; 

LEXICON N13
! FIXME: This is terrible

%<n%>:%>                                                     Sufijos1 ; 
%<n%>:%>                                                     Sufijos2 ; 
%<n%>:%>                                                     Sufijos4 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>es                                             Sufijos1 ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>es                                             Sufijos2 ; 



LEXICON REL

%<n%>%<rel%>:                                                Sufijos3 ; 

LEXICON A

%<adj%>:                                                     # ; 
%<adj%>%<ints%>:%>laj                                        # ; 

LEXICON NUM1

%<num%>:                                                     # ; 

LEXICON NUM2

%<num%>:                                                     # ; 

LEXICON NUM3

%<num%>%<dist%>:                                             # ; 

LEXICON COG1

%<np%>%<cog%>:                                               # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<pl%>:%>aabʼ                                   # ;

LEXICON COG2

%<np%>%<cog%>:                                               # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<pl%>:%>iibʼ                                   # ;

LEXICON COG3

%<np%>%<cog%>:                                               # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<pl%>:%>ʼiibʼ                                  # ;

LEXICON COG4

%<np%>%<cog%>:                                               # ;
! TODO: Añadir plural

LEXICON COG5

%<np%>%<cog%>:                                               # ;

LEXICON ANTF

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:                                          # ;

LEXICON ANTM

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:                                          # ;

LEXICON TOP

%<np%>%<top%>:                                               # ;

LEXICON AL

%<np%>%<al%>:                                                # ;


LEXICON ADV1

%<adv%>:                                                     # ; 

LEXICON ADV2

%<adv%>%<itg%>:                                              # ; 

LEXICON DET1

%<det%>:                                                     # ; 

LEXICON DET2

%<det%>%<pl%>:                                               # ; 

LEXICON DET3

%<det%>%<itg%>:                                              # ; 

LEXICON DET4

%<det%>%<qnt%>:                                              # ; 

LEXICON PRON2

%<prn%>%<itg%>:                                              # ; 

LEXICON PRON3

%<prn%>%<dem%>:                                              # ; 



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Sustantivos 
ichaaj:ich                   N2 ; ! "hierba" [#]
awaj:awaj                    N3 ; ! "animal" [#]
ajchaak:aj%>chaak            N4 ; ! "trabajador" [aj#]
ajtiijbʼ:aj%>tiijbʼ          N4 ; ! "estudiante" [aj#]
ajbʼiix:aj%>bʼiix            N4 ; ! "cantante" [aj#]
tiʼniik:tiʼ                  N5 ; ! "carne" [#niik]
qʼuniik:qʼu                  N5 ; ! "chamarra" [#niik]
alibʼxeel:alibʼ              N6 ; ! "nuera" [#xeel]
kʼojolxeel:kʼojol            N6 ; ! "joven" [#xeel]
qajawxeel:qajaw              N6 ; ! "dueño" [#xeel] ! FIXME: qa- poss. ?
qʼunxeel:qʼun                N6 ; ! "hermano menor" [#xeel]
l%<det%>%+ékʼel:l%>ékʼel     N9 ; ! "" ! Src/Palmer
l%<det%>%+ékʼel:l%>ekʼl      N9 ; ! "" ! Src/Palmer
l%<det%>%+ékʼel:l%>ékʼl      N9 ; ! "" ! Src/Palmer
chaaj:chaaj                  N1 ; ! "ceniza" [#]
kʼutubʼ:kʼutubʼ              N8 ; ! "medidor" [#ubʼ]
jaa:jaa                      N9 ; ! "casa" [#]
ixóqil:ixóq                  N10 ; ! "hembra"
maak:maak                    N1 ; ! "culpa" [#]
bolsa:bolsa                  N11 ; ! "ceremonia" [#]
leña:leña                    N11 ; ! ""
autoridad:autoridad          N13 ; ! ""
comunidad:comunidad          N13 ; ! ""
condición:condici            N12 ; ! ""
conversación:conversaci      N12 ; ! ""
corrupción:corrupci          N12 ; ! ""
necesidad:necesidad          N13 ; ! ""
realidad:realidad            N13 ; ! ""
tradición:tradici            N12 ; ! ""
aldeya:aldeya                N11 ; ! "" ! Src/Palmer
juut:juut                    N1 ; ! "" ! Src/Palmer
salon:salon           N1 ; ! "" ! Src/Palmer
tío:tío                      N11 ; ! ""
LEXICON Propios 
Bʼoobʼlaj:Bʼoobʼlaj          TOP ; ! ""
Kʼixpaaj:Kʼixpaaj            TOP ; ! ""
Kʼisachaal:Kʼisachaal        TOP ; ! "Quisachal" [#]
Chimeel:Chimeel              TOP ; ! "Chimel" [#]
Koʼr:Koʼr                    COG1 ; 
Tum:Tum                      COG2 ;
Aware:Aware                  COG3 ; 
Xooy:Xooy                    COG4 ; ! "apellido" [#]
Pakay:Pacay                  COG4 ; ! "Pacay" [Pakay]
Ixchoobʼ:Ixchoobʼ            COG4 ; ! "Ixchop" [#]
Chitop:Chitop                COG4 ; ! "Chitop" [#]
Méndez:Méndez                COG5 ; ! ""
Peña:Peña                    COG5 ; ! ""
Paal:Paal                    ANTM ; ! "Gaspar" [#]
Leʼn:Leʼn                    ANTF ; ! "Magdalena" [#]
Luʼs:Luʼs                    ANTF ; ! "Lucía" [#]
Waan:Waan                    ANTM ; ! "Juan" [#]
Liix:Liix                    ANTM ; ! "Andrés" [#]
Jwanita:Jwanita              ANTF ; ! ""
Liyandro:Liyandro            ANTM ; ! ""
Yesika:Yesika                ANTF ; ! ""
COVID%-19:COVID%-19          AL ; ! ""
nCOV:nCOV                    AL ; ! ""
OMS:OMS                      AL ; ! ""
2019%-nCOV:2019%-nCOV        AL ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjetivos 
aakʼ:aakʼ                    A ; ! "nuevo" [#]
bʼeyeey:bʼeyeey              A ; ! "flexible" [#]
qʼan:qʼan                    A ; ! "amarillo" [j#aal]
pkʼaʼy:pkʼaʼy                A ; ! "flaco" [#]
LEXICON Adverbios 
lamaas:lamaas                ADV2 ; ! "dónde"
lamaas:lamas                 ADV2 ; ! "dónde" ! Src/Shoebox
nemoo:nemoo                  ADV2 ; ! "" 
nemoo:nemo                   ADV2 ; ! "" 
ójr:ójr                      ADV1 ; ! "antiguamente" [#]
naj:naj                      ADV1 ; ! "lejos" [#]
lékej:lékej                  ADV1 ; ! "arriba" [#]
juntiir:juntiiiiir           ADV1 ; ! "todos" [#] ! Use/Spell ! Src/narrative
LEXICON IVʼ
pet:pet                      V-IV ; ! "venir" [#iik]
bʼen:bʼen                    V-IV ; ! "caminar" [#]
loʼw:loʼw                    V-IV ; ! "comer" [#]
ook:ook                      V-IV ; ! ""
bʼison:bʼiison               V-IV ; ! ""
LEXICON TVʼ
maj:maaj                     V-TV ; ! "quitar, comenzar, masajear" [#iik]
mol:mol                      V-TV ; ! "juntar, recoger" [#iik]
kamsáj:kamsá                 V-TV-D ; ! "matar" [#j]
komsáj:komsá                 V-TV-D ; ! "matar" [#j]
kʼamwaj:kʼamwa               V-TV-D ; ! "agradecer" [#j]
kunaj:kuna                   V-TV-D ; ! ""
tzʼiibʼan:tzʼiibʼan          V-TV ; ! ""
natun:natun V-TV ; ! "" ! Src/Palmer
